Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-755
Industrial sickness and accident insurance, defined.

The term industrial sickness and accident insurance as used herein means sickness and accident insurance under individual policies for which the premium is payable weekly, and includes any such policy which covers sickness only or accident only.

Laws 1947, c. 164, § 14(1), p. 467.